Mississippi, session 2026, HB1940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of paying for certain outside legal assistance, expert witness fees, court fees, judgments and settlement agreements incurred by the Office of the Attorney General for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026............................ $ 394,000.00. Of the funds appropriated in this section, the following amounts are provided: (a)  United States Environmental Protection Agency and the State of Mississippi; Chemfax, Inc., Superfund Site, Gulfport, Harrison County, Mississippi; Docket Number CERCLA 04 2014 3756.................. ................................................ $ 10,000.00 (b)  Curtis Flowers v. State of Mississippi, Circuit Court of Montgomery County, Mississippi, Cause No. 1:20 cv 00150 ................................................ $ 50,000.00 (c)  Eddie Lee Howard v. State of Mississippi, Circuit Court of Lowndes County, Mississippi, Cause No. 2021 0026 CV1C ................................................ $ 50,000.00 (d)  Sherwood Dwayne Brown v. State of Mississippi, Circuit Court of Desoto County, No. 22-287........................ $ 50,000.00 (e)  Courtney Williams v. State of Mississippi, Circuit Court of Yazoo County, No. 23-00012....................... $     48,000.00 (f)  Kelton K. Hathorne, Sr. v. State of Mississippi, Circuit Court of Forrest County, Mississippi, No. 25-cv-00095................. ................................................ $ 86,000.00 (g) Civil Action No. 3:23-cv-233-DPJ-ASH United States District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi.................. ................................................ $ 100,000.00. SECTION 2.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of paying for certain outside legal assistance, expert witness fees, court fees, judgments and settlement agreements incurred by the Office of the Attorney General for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027................ $   720,000.00. Of the funds appropriated in this section, the following amounts are provided: (a)  Olivia Y., et al v. Tate Reeves, as Governor of the State of Mississippi and the Department of Human Services, United States District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi, Jackson Division, Cause No. 3:03cv251(L)(N)............................... $   120,000.00 (b)  White, et al.v. State Board of Election Commissioners, et al., No.4:22-CV-00062-SA-JMV (N.D. Miss)................ $ 100,000.00 (c)  Mississippi State Conference of the National Conference for the Advancement of Colored People, et al. v. State Board of Election Commissioners, et al. No. 3:22-cv-734 (S.D. Miss)................ ................................................. $ 100,000.00 (d)  AbbVie Inc., et al. v. Fitch, Civil Action No. 1:24-cv-00184-HSO-BWR (S.D. Miss.).............................. $   100,000.00 (e)  AstraZeneca Pharmaceuticals LP v. Fitch, 1:24-cv-00196-LG-BWR (S.D. Miss.)...................................... $   100,000.00 (f)  Express Scripts Pharmacy, Inc. v. Mississippi Board of Pharmacy, et al., 1:25-cv-01390................... $   100,000.00 (g) Arkela Lewis, et al. v. Mississippi Department of Public Safety, et al., 3:25-cv-721 (S.D. Miss.).................. $ 100,000.00 SECTION 3.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi State Department of Health for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027..... $   3,748,030.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying legal expenses associated with the City of Jackson Water litigation. SECTION 4.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027..... $  8,000,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the repair, renovation, and relocation expenses that occurred due to the closing of the Bolton Building. SECTION 5.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027..... $ 1,250,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred by the Mississippi Semiquincentennial Commission to plan, promote and implement public celebrations, events, programs and commemorations as outlined in Section 39-41-1, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 6.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Department of Education for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.. $    16,626.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the Educable Child Program. SECTION 7.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure for the period beginning upon passage of this act, and ending June 30, 2027............................ $    758,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to office relocation and furnishing. SECTION 8.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026....................................................... ................................................ $ 25,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the replacement of a vehicle. SECTION 9.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........... $    149,500.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to Civil Action No. 3:24-cv-607-DPJ-ASH and Civil Action No. 3:24-cv-464-KHJ-MTP (S.D. Miss.) settlement agreements. SECTION 10.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the department, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the State Department of Education for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027................................................ $ 9,000,000.00 This additional appropriation is for the implementation and operation of the Adolescent Literacy Initiative created in the House amendment to Senate Bill No. 2294, 2026 Regular Session. SECTION 11.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the department, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the State Department of Education for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027................................................ $ 3,480,000.00 This additional appropriation is for the implementation and operation of the Mississippi Math Act, including the Moving Mathematics in Mississippi Program, created in the House amendment to Senate Bill No. 2294, 2026 Regular Session. SECTION 12.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the department, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the State Department of Education for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. $ 120,600.00 This additional appropriation is for the incorporation of financial literacy components within the existing curriculum offered in Grades 6 through 8, as required in the House amendment to Senate Bill No. 2294, 2026 Regular Session. SECTION 13.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 14. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after passage.